src/nlpia/data/words_libre_office_names_us.aff
FLAG num
SFX 682 Y 1
SFX 682 0 yne .
SFX 219 Y 1
SFX 219 0 et's .
SFX 934 Y 1
SFX 934 0 erson's .
SFX 134 Y 1
SFX 134 0 is's .
SFX 73 Y 1
SFX 73 0 tta .
SFX 65 Y 1
SFX 65 0 tte .
SFX 869 Y 1
SFX 869 0 ldo .
SFX 659 Y 1
SFX 659 0 bell .
SFX 259 Y 1
SFX 259 0 ida's .
SFX 271 Y 1
SFX 271 0 beth's .
SFX 297 Y 1
SFX 297 0 line .
SFX 852 Y 1
SFX 852 0 ling .
SFX 524 Y 1
SFX 524 0 rt's .
SFX 685 Y 1
SFX 685 0 worth .
SFX 119 Y 1
SFX 119 0 lee .
SFX 426 Y 1
SFX 426 0 mie's .
SFX 357 Y 1
SFX 357 0 len .
SFX 863 Y 1
SFX 863 0 ler .
SFX 595 Y 1
SFX 595 0 les .
SFX 71 Y 1
SFX 71 0 ley .
SFX 80 Y 1
SFX 80 0 lyn's .
SFX 229 Y 1
SFX 229 0 ston's .
SFX 62 Y 1
SFX 62 0 ey's .
SFX 918 Y 1
SFX 918 0 gton's .
SFX 565 Y 1
SFX 565 0 nce's .
SFX 954 Y 1
SFX 954 0 dia's .
SFX 183 Y 1
SFX 183 0 se's .
SFX 42 Y 1
SFX 42 0 h's .
SFX 300 Y 1
SFX 300 0 lia .
SFX 212 Y 1
SFX 212 0 lie .
SFX 233 Y 1
SFX 233 0 ry's .
SFX 298 Y 1
SFX 298 0 lin .
SFX 969 Y 1
SFX 969 0 bra .
SFX 849 Y 1
SFX 849 0 lis .
SFX 848 Y 1
SFX 848 0 lisa .
SFX 54 Y 1
SFX 54 0 ton's .
SFX 32 Y 1
SFX 32 0 ia's .
SFX 211 Y 1
SFX 211 0 lie's .
SFX 210 Y 1
SFX 210 0 lla .
SFX 93 Y 1
SFX 93 0 lle .
SFX 272 Y 1
SFX 272 0 beth .
SFX 354 Y 1
SFX 354 0 lene's .
SFX 388 Y 1
SFX 388 0 tha's .
SFX 695 Y 1
SFX 695 0 va's .
SFX 380 Y 1
SFX 380 0 ah's .
SFX 291 Y 1
SFX 291 0 m's .
SFX 265 Y 1
SFX 265 0 ford's .
SFX 851 Y 1
SFX 851 0 ling's .
SFX 215 Y 1
SFX 215 0 ika's .
SFX 691 Y 1
SFX 691 0 ville's .
SFX 209 Y 1
SFX 209 0 lla's .
SFX 578 Y 1
SFX 578 0 lon .
SFX 845 Y 1
SFX 845 0 low .
SFX 716 Y 1
SFX 716 0 tina's .
SFX 950 Y 1
SFX 950 0 dora's .
SFX 804 Y 1
SFX 804 0 op's .
SFX 20 Y 1
SFX 20 0 son's .
SFX 187 Y 1
SFX 187 0 ly's .
SFX 907 Y 1
SFX 907 0 inson .
SFX 378 Y 1
SFX 378 0 am's .
SFX 36 Y 1
SFX 36 0 r's .
SFX 242 Y 1
SFX 242 0 nette .
SFX 715 Y 1
SFX 715 0 tin's .
SFX 181 Y 1
SFX 181 0 sha's .
SFX 148 Y 1
SFX 148 0 el's .
SFX 989 Y 1
SFX 989 0 yll's .
SFX 197 Y 1
SFX 197 0 ca's .
SFX 52 Y 1
SFX 52 0 ell's .
SFX 250 Y 1
SFX 250 0 land .
SFX 637 Y 1
SFX 637 0 di's .
SFX 642 Y 1
SFX 642 0 den .
SFX 915 Y 1
SFX 915 0 ian .
SFX 477 Y 1
SFX 477 0 ar's .
SFX 683 Y 1
SFX 683 0 w's .
SFX 648 Y 1
SFX 648 0 cock .
SFX 622 Y 1
SFX 622 0 ica .
SFX 262 Y 1
SFX 262 0 ice .
SFX 260 Y 1
SFX 260 0 ida .
SFX 66 Y 1
SFX 66 0 ette's .
SFX 344 Y 1
SFX 344 0 nell's .
SFX 680 Y 1
SFX 680 0 yne's .
SFX 955 Y 1
SFX 955 0 dia .
SFX 953 Y 1
SFX 953 0 die .
SFX 81 Y 1
SFX 81 0 lyn .
SFX 656 Y 1
SFX 656 0 bell's .
SFX 122 Y 1
SFX 122 0 ene's .
SFX 390 Y 1
SFX 390 0 sy's .
SFX 126 Y 1
SFX 126 0 te's .
SFX 655 Y 1
SFX 655 0 bel's .
SFX 108 Y 1
SFX 108 0 ing's .
SFX 566 Y 1
SFX 566 0 nce .
SFX 649 Y 1
SFX 649 0 ck's .
SFX 455 Y 1
SFX 455 0 igan .
SFX 60 Y 1
SFX 60 0 ll's .
SFX 175 Y 1
SFX 175 0 nda .
SFX 847 Y 1
SFX 847 0 lisa's .
SFX 653 Y 1
SFX 653 0 bury's .
SFX 320 Y 1
SFX 320 0 anne's .
SFX 2 Y 1
SFX 2 0 e's .
SFX 988 Y 1
SFX 988 0 yl's .
SFX 417 Y 1
SFX 417 0 ner .
SFX 825 Y 1
SFX 825 0 nes .
SFX 208 Y 1
SFX 208 0 ney .
SFX 110 Y 1
SFX 110 0 ett's .
SFX 318 Y 1
SFX 318 0 don .
SFX 216 Y 1
SFX 216 0 ika .
SFX 752 Y 1
SFX 752 0 sey's .
SFX 618 Y 1
SFX 618 0 iko .
SFX 717 Y 1
SFX 717 0 tina .
SFX 665 Y 1
SFX 665 0 anda's .
SFX 498 Y 1
SFX 498 0 tine .
SFX 116 Y 1
SFX 116 0 man's .
SFX 416 Y 1
SFX 416 0 ner's .
SFX 837 Y 1
SFX 837 0 maria .
SFX 431 Y 1
SFX 431 0 marie .
SFX 911 Y 1
SFX 911 0 ila .
SFX 910 Y 1
SFX 910 0 ila's .
SFX 666 Y 1
SFX 666 0 anda .
SFX 816 Y 1
SFX 816 0 ning's .
SFX 669 Y 1
SFX 669 0 ae's .
SFX 780 Y 1
SFX 780 0 ret's .
SFX 819 Y 1
SFX 819 0 nia .
SFX 75 Y 1
SFX 75 0 nie .
SFX 270 Y 1
SFX 270 0 dra .
SFX 472 Y 1
SFX 472 0 een's .
SFX 289 Y 1
SFX 289 0 my's .
SFX 333 Y 1
SFX 333 0 sen .
SFX 383 Y 1
SFX 383 0 well .
SFX 51 Y 1
SFX 51 0 ina .
SFX 41 Y 1
SFX 41 0 ine .
SFX 109 Y 1
SFX 109 0 ing .
SFX 753 Y 1
SFX 753 0 sey .
SFX 606 Y 1
SFX 606 0 isha's .
SFX 16 Y 1
SFX 16 0 ne's .
SFX 647 Y 1
SFX 647 0 cock's .
SFX 261 Y 1
SFX 261 0 ice's .
SFX 836 Y 1
SFX 836 0 maria's .
SFX 338 Y 1
SFX 338 0 rd's .
SFX 182 Y 1
SFX 182 0 sha .
SFX 30 Y 1
SFX 30 0 da's .
SFX 572 Y 1
SFX 572 0 mer's .
SFX 505 Y 1
SFX 505 0 tel's .
SFX 623 Y 1
SFX 623 0 house's .
SFX 944 Y 1
SFX 944 0 eka's .
SFX 979 Y 1
SFX 979 0 anie .
SFX 38 Y 1
SFX 38 0 o's .
SFX 395 Y 1
SFX 395 0 sie .
SFX 610 Y 1
SFX 610 0 ington's .
SFX 132 Y 1
SFX 132 0 nna .
SFX 145 Y 1
SFX 145 0 nne .
SFX 131 Y 1
SFX 131 0 nna's .
SFX 799 Y 1
SFX 799 0 ore's .
SFX 958 Y 1
SFX 958 0 dale's .
SFX 903 Y 1
SFX 903 0 isa .
SFX 348 Y 1
SFX 348 0 ndra .
SFX 367 Y 1
SFX 367 0 ise .
SFX 641 Y 1
SFX 641 0 den's .
SFX 817 Y 1
SFX 817 0 ning .
SFX 180 Y 1
SFX 180 0 tt's .
SFX 815 Y 1
SFX 815 0 non .
SFX 874 Y 1
SFX 874 0 ks's .
SFX 536 Y 1
SFX 536 0 rick's .
SFX 553 Y 1
SFX 553 0 nor .
SFX 83 Y 1
SFX 83 0 ita .
SFX 468 Y 1
SFX 468 0 ers's .
SFX 543 Y 1
SFX 543 0 or's .
SFX 532 Y 1
SFX 532 0 ri's .
SFX 790 Y 1
SFX 790 0 pson's .
SFX 538 Y 1
SFX 538 0 ria's .
SFX 479 Y 1
SFX 479 0 all's .
SFX 24 Y 1
SFX 24 0 t's .
SFX 124 Y 1
SFX 124 0 elle's .
SFX 902 Y 1
SFX 902 0 isa's .
SFX 226 Y 1
SFX 226 0 anna .
SFX 861 Y 1
SFX 861 0 ler's .
SFX 321 Y 1
SFX 321 0 anne .
SFX 551 Y 1
SFX 551 0 no's .
SFX 68 Y 1
SFX 68 0 en's .
SFX 684 Y 1
SFX 684 0 worth's .
SFX 273 Y 1
SFX 273 0 ty's .
SFX 21 Y 1
SFX 21 0 son .
SFX 670 Y 1
SFX 670 0 ae .
SFX 381 Y 1
SFX 381 0 ah .
SFX 668 Y 1
SFX 668 0 al .
SFX 379 Y 1
SFX 379 0 am .
SFX 89 Y 1
SFX 89 0 an .
SFX 478 Y 1
SFX 478 0 ar .
SFX 224 Y 1
SFX 224 0 as .
SFX 662 Y 1
SFX 662 0 ay .
SFX 599 Y 1
SFX 599 0 ld's .
SFX 858 Y 1
SFX 858 0 less's .
SFX 868 Y 1
SFX 868 0 ldo's .
SFX 412 Y 1
SFX 412 0 ow's .
SFX 814 Y 1
SFX 814 0 non's .
SFX 973 Y 1
SFX 973 0 bi .
SFX 64 Y 1
SFX 64 0 tte's .
SFX 200 Y 1
SFX 200 0 by .
SFX 153 Y 1
SFX 153 0 wood .
SFX 198 Y 1
SFX 198 0 ca .
SFX 99 Y 1
SFX 99 0 ce .
SFX 319 Y 1
SFX 319 0 ch .
SFX 650 Y 1
SFX 650 0 ck .
SFX 961 Y 1
SFX 961 0 co .
SFX 774 Y 1
SFX 774 0 rine's .
SFX 12 Y 1
SFX 12 0 y's .
SFX 155 Y 1
SFX 155 0 ka's .
SFX 31 Y 1
SFX 31 0 da .
SFX 957 Y 1
SFX 957 0 de .
SFX 640 Y 1
SFX 640 0 di .
SFX 947 Y 1
SFX 947 0 dt .
SFX 222 Y 1
SFX 222 0 dy .
SFX 936 Y 1
SFX 936 0 era's .
SFX 812 Y 1
SFX 812 0 nt's .
SFX 86 Y 1
SFX 86 0 es's .
SFX 232 Y 1
SFX 232 0 ssa .
SFX 474 Y 1
SFX 474 0 ch's .
SFX 983 Y 1
SFX 983 0 ala .
SFX 151 Y 1
SFX 151 0 ee .
SFX 821 Y 1
SFX 821 0 ngton .
SFX 480 Y 1
SFX 480 0 all .
SFX 149 Y 1
SFX 149 0 el .
SFX 69 Y 1
SFX 69 0 en .
SFX 47 Y 1
SFX 47 0 er .
SFX 87 Y 1
SFX 87 0 es .
SFX 220 Y 1
SFX 220 0 et .
SFX 63 Y 1
SFX 63 0 ey .
SFX 850 Y 1
SFX 850 0 li's .
SFX 980 Y 1
SFX 980 0 ane's .
SFX 402 Y 1
SFX 402 0 rs's .
SFX 179 Y 1
SFX 179 0 ana .
SFX 981 Y 1
SFX 981 0 ane .
SFX 166 Y 1
SFX 166 0 ard's .
SFX 103 Y 1
SFX 103 0 ann .
SFX 664 Y 1
SFX 664 0 any .
SFX 661 Y 1
SFX 661 0 ay's .
SFX 692 Y 1
SFX 692 0 ville .
SFX 306 Y 1
SFX 306 0 ha .
SFX 106 Y 1
SFX 106 0 ny's .
SFX 33 Y 1
SFX 33 0 ia .
SFX 686 Y 1
SFX 686 0 way's .
SFX 15 Y 1
SFX 15 0 ie .
SFX 258 Y 1
SFX 258 0 in .
SFX 451 Y 1
SFX 451 0 io .
SFX 135 Y 1
SFX 135 0 is .
SFX 382 Y 1
SFX 382 0 well's .
SFX 269 Y 1
SFX 269 0 dra's .
SFX 58 Y 1
SFX 58 0 g's .
SFX 880 Y 1
SFX 880 0 kin .
SFX 977 Y 1
SFX 977 0 ara .
SFX 156 Y 1
SFX 156 0 ka .
SFX 167 Y 1
SFX 167 0 ard .
SFX 363 Y 1
SFX 363 0 ko .
SFX 875 Y 1
SFX 875 0 ks .
SFX 227 Y 1
SFX 227 0 yn's .
SFX 118 Y 1
SFX 118 0 lee's .
SFX 951 Y 1
SFX 951 0 dora .
SFX 914 Y 1
SFX 914 0 ian's .
SFX 978 Y 1
SFX 978 0 anie's .
SFX 49 Y 1
SFX 49 0 la .
SFX 600 Y 1
SFX 600 0 ld .
SFX 27 Y 1
SFX 27 0 le .
SFX 857 Y 1
SFX 857 0 li .
SFX 61 Y 1
SFX 61 0 ll .
SFX 188 Y 1
SFX 188 0 ly .
SFX 195 Y 1
SFX 195 0 ela's .
SFX 435 Y 1
SFX 435 0 ma .
SFX 577 Y 1
SFX 577 0 lon's .
SFX 570 Y 1
SFX 570 0 ms .
SFX 290 Y 1
SFX 290 0 my .
SFX 104 Y 1
SFX 104 0 ra's .
SFX 11 Y 1
SFX 11 0 na .
SFX 349 Y 1
SFX 349 0 nd .
SFX 17 Y 1
SFX 17 0 ne .
SFX 560 Y 1
SFX 560 0 ng .
SFX 238 Y 1
SFX 238 0 ni .
SFX 133 Y 1
SFX 133 0 nn .
SFX 554 Y 1
SFX 554 0 no .
SFX 550 Y 1
SFX 550 0 ns .
SFX 813 Y 1
SFX 813 0 nt .
SFX 107 Y 1
SFX 107 0 ny .
