src/nlpia/data/words_libre_office_names_us.dic
Alla/1,8,9,56,57,138,139,160,161,338,339,432,433,896,897,984,987
Ann/1,2,3,4,5,14,15,66,67,82,83,84,85,110,124,125,134,135,215,216,261,262,430,431
Ash/1,4,5,46,47,54,55,70,71,80,81,118,119,187,199,200,211,212,684,685,850
Belle/683
Cami/1,2,3,48,49,92,93,209,210,832,833
Carol/1,2,3,4,5,18,19,40,41,50,51,102,103,150,151,227,256,680,682
Chan/1,4,5,30,31,52,58,59,98,99,124,125,126,127,142,143,148,149,269,270,277,278,406,505,506,507,508,519,520,529,530,768,769,770,771
Cher/1,2,12,13,14,15,28,80,81,124,125,150,151,185,186,187,233,234,365,367,532,758,759,988,989,990
Christi/1,2,3,4,5,8,9,10,11,16,17,20,21,88,89,178,179,818,819,980,981
Clement/1,2,3,6,7,40,41,50,51
Cole/1,6,7,16,17,64,65,68,69,72,73,116,117,176,177,203,204,452,453,494,496,596,597,853,854
Cran/1,2,3,382,383
Cris/1,390,541,707
Dan/1,2,3,4,5,8,9,10,11,28,29,32,33,66,67,74,75,82,83,106,107,124,125,126,127,215,216,241,242,621,622,669,670,874,875
Dani/92,93,667,668
Dick/1,6,7,20,21,906,907
Dow/1,8,9,14,15,74,75,183,184,207,208,416,417,816,817,824,825,851,852
Ela/1,10,16,40,50,552,680,954
Flor/1,4,5,32,33,40,41,62,63,84,85,122,123,185,186,259,260,908,909,938,939
Foll/1,110
Fry/1,46,110,477
Hai/1,8,9,70,71,593,595,782,785,816,817,824,825
Hal/1,2,12,13,18,19,50,51,62,63,70,71,86,87,183,184,211,212,265,266,352,357,861,863
Hann/88,89,378,379,380,381,741,742
Hay/1,6,7,70,71,86,87,116,117,152,153,277,278,317,318,352,357,641,642,824,825
Isa/1,655,950
Jack/1,4,5,14,15,20,21,28,62,63,80,81
Jacqui/1,245,246,296,297,584,586
Jan/1,2,3,4,5,8,9,10,11,14,15,28,29,40,41,50,51,52,53,62,63,66,67,74,75,82,83,84,85,110,111,122,123,124,125,134,135,148,149,150,151,219,220,241,242,261,262,267,268,365,367,472,473,629,630,661,662,669,670,994,995
Jann/219,220
Jen/1,2,3,4,5,10,11,28,29,40,41,52,53,66,67,74,75,106,107,124,125,150,151,237,238,241,242,261,262,332,333,344,345,365,367,416,417,669,670,874,875,878,880
Jerri/1,2,3,197,198
Jess/1,2,3,804,805
Jon/1,2,3,4,5,10,11,14,15,28,29,52,53,58,59,74,75,86,87,124,125,223,224,380,381
Joyce/80
Judi/1,2,3
Kate/1,6,7,36,37,80,295,298,436,437,774,775,776,777,916,917
Lake/1,76,181,249,251,347,605,606,930
Lan/1,2,3,4,5,14,15,28,29,52,53,58,59,66,67,74,75,82,83,98,99,106,107,124,125,317,318,342,343,372,373,454,455,918,919,958,959
Lang/70,265,317,370,382,861
Laura/1,8,9,56,57,118,119,138,139,160,161,303,304,374,375,376,377
Lavon/1,2,3,4,5,10,11,16,17,30,31,32,33
Law/1,20,54,70,86,178,225,233,665,858
Lay/1,16,42,48,647
Lazar/1,38,201
Lea/18,19,42,43,154,319,388,389,474
Lean/1,2,3,4,5,8,9,10,11,16,17,169,269,270,342,343,400,401,511,513
Liz/1,4,5,66,67,271,272,629,630
Long/116,265,424,684
Low/1,2,46,47,52,53,86,87,185,186,256,258,934,935
Lue/1,72,209
Lyn/1,2,3,8,10,11,16,17,30,31,52,53,54,55,58,59,66,67,84,85,124,125,152,153,223,224,241,242,317,318,319,474,752,753,954,955
Man/1,4,5,8,9,12,13,14,15,30,31,54,55,221,222,637,640,816,817,952,953
Marc/1,12,42,122,201
Margaret/1,2,3,4,5,24,34,35,126,127
Marge/780
Matt/1,14,416,468
Mel/1,30,32,50,82,211,259,663,691,695,764,847,902,908
Michael/1,2,3,4,5,134,135
Mitch/1,52,148
Nichol/1,2,3,6,7,20,21,26,27,223,224
Olin/1,30
Palmer/229
Pam/1,195,267,910,982
Paul/1,4,5,40,41,50,51,66,67,82,83,84,85,122,123
Rae/1,102,354
Rene/1,2,3,4,5,72,73,128,129,251,252
Rick/1,12,62
Roe/1,572
Rosa/1,10,44,56,80,118,146,158,193,211,292,296,299,307,374,470,538,836,940
Rowe/1,10,60,213,359
Russ/1,52,148,485
Ruth/1,2,3,4,5,14,15,102,103,320,321
Sam/1,20,267,289,426,656,790,974,976
Selle/1,483,649
Sena/1,259
Shaw/8,10,11,131,132,174,175,178,179,225,226,665,666
Shon/1,4,5,10,11,30,31,34,35,235,236,269,270,523,525
Sol/1,187
Stan/1,54,58,70,217,265,490,635,653
Star/1,36,48,851
Stephen/1,6,7,14,15,20,21,332,333
Summer/1,6,7,217,218,691,692
Susann/380,381
Ted/1,221,653
Terra/136,565,932
Tish/1,4,5,861,863
Toni/1,2,3,4,5,34,35,181,182,877,879
Town/1,6,7,20,21,46,47,70,71
Venn/1,14,108,166
Vern/1,4,5,14,15,22,23,32,33,52,53,82,83,84,85,261,262,515,516,808,810
Warne/1,6,7,36,37
Way/1,8,16,17,352,357,577,578
Wild/1,4,5,46,47,108,109,116,117,601,602,924,925
Willia/291,569,570
